test/src/gt-desc-yamls/adjDES_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Adjectives that have a subform.

Tests:
  Adjective - almulasj: # ÅLLAGASJ, DÁRBBOLASJ
    almulasj+A+Attr: [almulasj, almmulasj]
    almulasj+A+Sg+Nom: [almulasj, almmulasj]
    almulasj+A+Sg+Acc: [almulattjav, almmulattjav]
    almulasj+A+Pl+Nom: [almulattja, almmulattja]
    almulasj+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [almulabbo, almulæbbo, almuläbbo, almulubbo]
    almulasj+A+Comp+Attr: [almulap, almulup]
    almulasj+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [almulamos, almulæmos, almulämos, almulumos]

  Adjective - bavhlak: # AGAdj, BASSTEL
    bavhlak+A+Attr: [bavhlak, bavlak]
    bavhlak+A+Sg+Nom: [bavhlak, bavlak]
    bavhlak+A+Sg+Ine: [bavhlagin, bavlagin]
    bavhlak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [bavhlagabbo, bavlagabbo, bavhlagæbbo, bavhlagäbbo, bavlagæbbo, bavlagäbbo, bavhlagubbo, bavlagubbo]
    bavhlak+A+Comp+Attr: [bavhlagap, bavhlagup, bavlagap, bavlagup]
    bavhlak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [bavhlagamos, bavlagamos, bavhlagæmos, bavhlagämos, bavlagæmos, bavlagämos, bavhlagumos, bavlagumos]

  Adjective - duplæksa: # BASSTEL, BOREÁLA
    duplæksa+A+Attr: duplevsa
    duplæksa+A+Sg+Nom: [duplæksa, dupläksa, dupleksa]
    duplæksa+A+Sg+Gen: []
    duplæksa+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    duplæksa+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - goanntsá: # GIEVRRA, HÁVSSKE
    goanntsá+A+Attr: goanntsás
    goanntsá+A+Sg+Nom: goanntsá
    goanntsá+A+Sg+Ela: goanntsás
    goanntsá+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: goanntsáp
    goanntsá+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: goanntsámus

  Adjective - gájvas: # TJIEGOS
    gájvas+A+Attr: [gájves, gájvas]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Nom: [gájvas, gájves]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Gen: [gájvvasa, gájvvása]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Acc: [gájvvasav, gájvvásav]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Ill: [gájvvasij, gájvvásij]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Ine: [gájvvasin, gájvvásin]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Ela: [gájvvasis, gájvvásis]
    gájvas+A+Sg+Com: [gájvvasijn, gájvvásijn, gájvvasijna, gájvvásijna]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Nom: [gájvvasa, gájvvása]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Gen: [gájvvasij, gájvvásij]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Acc: [gájvvasijt, gájvvásijt]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Ill: [gájvvasijda, gájvvásijda]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Ine: [gájvvasijn, gájvvásijn]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Ela: [gájvvasijs, gájvvásijs]
    gájvas+A+Pl+Com: [gájvvasij, gájvvásij]
    gájvas+A+Ess: [gájvvasin, gájvvásin]
    gájvas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [gájvvasabbo, gájvvásabbo, gájvvasæbbo, gájvvasäbbo, gájvvásæbbo, gájvvásäbbo, gájvvasubbo, gájvvásubbo]
    gájvas+A+Comp+Attr: [gájvvásap, gájvvásup, gájvvasap, gájvvasup]
    gájvas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [gájvvasamos, gájvvasumos, gájvvasæmos, gájvvasämos, gájvvásamos,gájvvásæmos, gájvvásämos, gájvvásumos]

  Adjective - didaktalasj: # TJIEGOS
    didávtalasj+A+Attr: [didávtalasj, didaktalasj, didáktalasj]
    didávtalasj+A+Sg+Nom: [didávtalasj, didaktalasj, didáktalasj]
    didávtalasj+A+Sg+Acc: [didávtalattjav, didaktalattjav, didáktalattjav]
    didávtalasj+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    didávtalasj+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - gåntsas: #
    gåntsas+A+Attr: [gåntsas, goantsas]
    gåntsas+A+Sg+Nom: [gåntsas, goantsas]
    gåntsas+A+Sg+Gen: goanntsasa
    gåntsas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [goanntsasabbo,goanntsasæbbo, goanntsasäbbo,goanntsasubbo]
    gåntsas+A+Comp+Attr: [goanntsasap, goanntsasup]
    gåntsas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [goanntsasamos,goanntsasæmos, goanntsasämos,goanntsasumos]

  Adjective - hæhkkaráduk: # BASSTEL, AGAdj
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Attr: [hæhkkaráduk, hähkkaráduk, hähkkarádugis, hæhkkarádugis]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Sg+Nom: [hæhkkaráduk, hähkkaráduk]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Sg+Com: [hæhkkarádugijn, hähkkarádugijn, hähkkarádugijna, hæhkkarádugijna]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [hæhkkarádugabbo, hähkkarádugabbo, hæhkkarádugæbbo, hæhkkarádugäbbo,hæhkkarádugubbo, hähkkarádugubbo, hähkkarádugæbbo, hähkkarádugäbbo]
    hæhkkaráduk+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [hæhkkarádugamos, hähkkarádugamos, hæhkkarádugumos, hähkkarádugumos,hæhkkarádugæmos, hæhkkarádugämos, hähkkarádugämos, hähkkarádugæmos]

  Adjective - iehpeformálla: # ÀLLA
    iehpeformálla+A+Attr: [iehpeformála, iehpeformella, iehpeformælla, iehpeformälla]
    iehpeformálla+A+Sg+Nom: [iehpeformálla, iehpeformella, iehpeformælla, iehpeformälla]
    iehpeformálla+A+Sg+Ine: [iehpeformálan, iehpeformellan, iehpeformællan, iehpeformällan]
    iehpeformálla+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    iehpeformálla+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - lånjok: # BASSTEL, LEXATTR
    lånjok+A+Attr: [lånjogis, låddnjis, lånjugis]
    lånjok+A+Sg+Nom: [lånjok, lånjuk]
    lånjok+A+Sg+Gen: [lånjoga, lånjuga]
    lånjok+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [lånjogabbo,lånjogæbbo, lånjogäbbo, lånjogubbo, lånjugabbo,lånjugæbbo, lånjugäbbo,lånjugubbo]
    lånjok+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [lånjogamos,lånjogæmos, lånjogämos,lånjogumos, lånjugamos,lånjugæmos, lånjugämos,lånjugumos]

  Adjective - nanos: # TJIEGOS, NUORTTALABBO
    nanos+A+Attr: nanos
    nanos+A+Sg+Nom: nanos
    nanos+A+Sg+Acc: nannusav
    nanos+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [nannusabbo, nannusæbbo, nannusäbbo,nannusubbo, nanusabbo,nanusæbbo, nanusäbbo,nanusubbo]
    nanos+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [nannusamos,nannusæmos, nannusämos,nannusumos, nanusamos,nanusumos,nanusæmos, nanusämos]

  Adjective - tsåhkevigák: # At, AGAdj
    tsåhkevigák+A+Attr: [tsåhkevigák, tsåhkevigágis]
    tsåhkevigák+A+Sg+Nom: tsåhkevigák
    tsåhkevigák+A+Sg+Com: [tsåhkevigágijn, tsåhkevigágijna]
    tsåhkevigák+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    tsåhkevigák+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []
